tok.foma
  # dots as ellipsis
	    [%. sym:"graph+silent"]^2 eb @-> || \sym  _  .#. ,,  # probably Whatsapp adding a dot
	    [%. sym:"graph+silent"]+ %. sym:"sym+ellipsis+prebreak"  @-> ||  _   ,,  # more than one dot send for future intonation, but add a pause for now 
	
			  [%, sym:"sym+postbreak"] (%, sym:"sym+postbreak")* %, sym:"graph+multiple"  @-> ||  _    ,,
			  [%: sym:"sym+postbreak"] (%: sym:"sym+postbreak")* %: sym:"graph+multiple"  @-> ||  _     
				;

define colonMap 
				sym:"graph+to" @-> ||  [num | dig]  %: _ Digit 
				.o.
				sym:"graph" @-> ||  %: _ \eb  ## if not space followin, pronounce it
				 ;

define subTagTest  
		hyphenMap .o. underscoreMap .o. otherMultiples .o. colonMap
		.o. 
		sym:"sym+query" -> || %? _ eb .#. 
		.o.
		sym:"sym+exclam" -> || %! _ eb .#. 
    .o.
		eosHandling 
		.o. 
   					# HACK.  Silence dot after a word and before a space
	   sym:"sym+postbreak" @-> || Letter^>1 word %. _ eb 
		 .o. 
   # no pause  if it comes after a single letter and before a space or another single letter dot (so U.S.A. is silent dotted)
	   sym:"graph+silent" @-> || \Letter Letter [word|lseq] %. _  [eb | Letter [word|lseq] (eos) %. ] 
		.o.
    # silent punctuation
		 	sym:"sym+postbreak" @-> 	|| SilentBeforeSpace.u _ [eb | hyphen | SilentBeforeSpace.u],  AlwaysSilentPause.u _    # colons and semi-colons
		 .o. 
		 # ampersand becomes plane "and" if it is HAS space on both sides
		%& sym:"graph+and" @-> || WSpace sb _ eb WSpace  
		.o.  
		sym:"sym+postbreak" @-> || pauseSymbol.u _ 
	 .o. 
	 [[Symbol.u - AlwaysSilent.u] [sym:graph]] @-> || \eos  _    # any silent sym without a pause, becomes spoken
	 .o.  
	 "graph+silent":sym @-> || _   # remove protection on pauseless colon
	.o.  eos:0 -> || _ 
	 ; 

define ContextTokenizer  postalCode .o. ConvertPhoneNumbers .o. numberBanks .o. TimeMap .o. chunkDigs ; 

define CoreInputWord  sb [\[tag | sb | eb | [sb \eb+ eb]]]+ eb ;

define CoreInputSpace [\[tag | sb | eb]]* ; 
define CoreInput CoreInputWord [CoreInputSpace CoreInputWord]* ;  

regex CoreInput .o. BasicTokenizer ;
write att basic.att
clear

regex ContextTokenizer; 
write att context.att
clear

regex subTagTest ; 
write att subtags.att
clear

regex CoreInput .o. BasicTokenizer .o. ContextTokenizer .o. subTagTest ; 
## clear 
## system ../general/att2bin /tmp/basic.att /tmp/context.att tok.fst
